Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5957YH (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2170 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.13H Minimum preseason and 1 in-season roster size requirements. 2 1. The Iowa high school athletic association or its 3 successor organization and the Iowa girls high school athletic 4 union or its successor organization shall adopt a policy 5 establishing minimum preseason and in-season roster sizes 6 for all interscholastic sports sponsored by participating 7 schools. The policy shall not allow an interscholastic sports 8 team that does not meet the minimum roster size requirements 9 to participate in extracurricular interscholastic athletic 10 contests or competitions sponsored by the Iowa high school 11 athletic association or the Iowa girls high school athletic 12 union. 13 2. Notwithstanding section 280.13A, or any transfer, 14 residency, or eligibility rules adopted by the Iowa high 15 school athletic association, its successor organization, 16 the Iowa girls high school athletic union, or its successor 17 organization, a student who was listed on the team roster 18 on the last day immediately preceding the date on which the 19 team became ineligible to participate in extracurricular 20 interscholastic athletic contests or competitions under 21 subsection 1 shall be eligible, for the remainder of the 22 season, to participate in that interscholastic sport at any 23 public school located within thirty miles of the studentâs 24 attendance center, provided that such school authorizes the 25 student to participate, and without an agreement under section 26 280.13A. 27 3. A student who participates in an extracurricular 28 interscholastic athletic contest or competition pursuant 29 to subsection 2 shall be deemed to satisfy the residence 30 requirements for purposes of section 256.46. 31